District of Columbia statutes.
29-308.02

Amendment before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors, or its incorporators if it has no board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720